North Dakota, session 69, HB1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 6-09.4-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-09.4-22. Protection of service during term of loan.
1. The service provided or made available by a political subdivision through the construction or
acquisition of an improvement, or the revenues therefrom, financed in whole or in part with a
loan to the political subdivision from the public finance authority or any other state agency or
enterprise, may not be curtailed or limited by inclusion of all or any part of the area served by
the political subdivision within the boundaries of any other political subdivision, or by the
granting of any private franchise for similar service within the area served by the political
subdivision, during the term of the loan. The political subdivision providing the service may not
be required to obtain or secure any franchise, license, or permit as a condition of continuing to
serve the area if it is included within the boundaries of another political subdivision during the
term of the loan.
2. Under the circumstances described in subsection 1, nothing prevents the two political
subdivisions, with the public finance authority or other state agency or enterprise, from
negotiating an agreement for the right or obligation to provide the service in question, provided
that any agreement is invalid and unenforceable unless the public finance authority or other
state agency or enterprise is a party to the agreement and unless the agreement contains
adequate safeguards to ensure the security and timely payment of any outstanding bonds of
the public finance authority issued to fund the loan.
3. An agreement made before January 1, 2025, and in violation of subsection 2 is voidable only
at the option of the public finance authority or other state agency or enterprise upon thirty days
written notice from the public finance authority or other state agency or enterprise to the
parties of the agreement. This subsection does not apply to litigation commenced before
January 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1537 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1537 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State